Illinois, session 104th, HB279.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Good Samaritan Medical Equipment Donor Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (745 ILCS 51/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Good 8Samaritan Medical Equipment Donor Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-183, eff. 1-1-12.)